Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-701.06
Sections, how construed; precedence over other laws.

The provisions of sections 72-701.01 to 72-701.06, in the event they shall be employed, shall control and take precedence over any provision of any other law to the contrary or in conflict therewith; Provided, that nothing herein shall be construed as contravening, suspending, or otherwise affecting the provisions of the Constitution of Nebraska or general laws of this state relating to the permanent relocation of the seat of state government.

Laws 1959, c. 332, § 6, p. 1209.